District of Columbia statutes.
42-2004

Transfer of individual units; incidents of real property; recordation.

Once the property is subdivided into the horizontal property regime, a condominium unit in the project may be individually conveyed, leased, and encumbered and may be inherited or devised by will, as if it were sole and entirely independent of the other condominium units in the project of which it forms a part; the said separate units shall have the same incidents as real property and the corresponding individual titles and interests therein shall be recordable.

Dec. 21, 1963, 77 Stat. 451, Pub. L. 88-218, § 4
May 22, 1975, D.C. Law 1-3, § 2(2), 21 DCR 3945
1981 Ed., § 45-1704.
1973 Ed., § 5-904.
Supersedure of chapter: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 42-2001.